Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4616
Appointment to deceased appointee or permissible appointee's descendant.

(a) Subject to section 30-2343, an appointment to a deceased appointee is ineffective.

(b) Unless the terms of the instrument creating a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, a powerholder of a nongeneral power may exercise the power in favor of, or create a new power of appointment in, a descendant of a deceased permissible appointee whether or not the descendant is described by the donor as a permissible appointee.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 39.